Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 289A.19, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Returns including nontaxed capital gains. new text end new text begin The commissioner must grant an automatic extension of 275 days to file an individual income tax return that includes an amount added to an individual's federal adjusted gross income under section 290.0131, subdivision 21. Where good cause exists, the commissioner may grant an extension of an additional 180 days for filing this return. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0131, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Nontaxed capital gains. new text end new text begin The amount of nontaxed capital gains as determined under section 290.055 that exceeds $1,000,000 is an addition. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [290.055] NONTAXED CAPITAL GAINS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Federal gross estate" means the gross estate of a decedent as required to be valued and otherwise determined for federal estate tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin (c) "Nontaxed capital asset" means a capital asset as defined in section 1221(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, but does not include land classified as class 2a agricultural homestead as determined under chapter 273. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Determination of nontaxed capital gains. new text end new text begin A taxpayer's nontaxed capital gains equals the sum of the gains on each nontaxed capital asset owned by a taxpayer on the date of the taxpayer's death. The amount of each gain is equal to the amount that would be required to be included in the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income if the asset was sold on the date of the taxpayer's death at a value equal to the value of the asset if it was includable in the decedent's federal gross estate. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end